Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.451, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Residents deleted text begin 90deleted text end new text begin 65new text end years of age or older; fishing. A resident age deleted text begin 90deleted text end new text begin 65new text end or older may take fish without a license.